Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2701.13
Engaged in business in this state, defined.

(1) Engaged in business in this state means conducting operations in this state that exceed the limitations of the commerce clause and due process clause of the United States Constitution and includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(a) Maintaining, occupying, or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary or agent, by whatever name called, an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse, storage place, or other place of business in this state;

(b) Having any representative, agent, salesperson, canvasser, facilitator, or solicitor operating in this state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, or taking orders for any property;

(c) Deriving rentals from a lease of property in this state by any retailer;

(d) Soliciting retail sales of property from residents of this state on a continuous, regular, or systematic basis by means of advertising which is broadcast into this state or installed onto an electronic device located in this state;

(e) Soliciting or facilitating orders from or sales to residents of this state if the activities are continuous, regular, seasonal, or systematic or if the retailer benefits from any activities occurring in this state or benefits from the location in this state of authorized installation, servicing, or repair facilities;

(f) Being owned or controlled by the same interests which own or control any retailer engaged in business in this state; or

(g) Maintaining or having a franchisee or licensee operating under the retailer's trade name in this state if the franchisee or licensee is required to collect the tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

(2) A retailer who lacks a physical presence in this state and who operates a website or other digital medium or media to execute sales to purchasers of property subject to sales or use taxes in this state, or who uses a multivendor marketplace platform that acts as an intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and the purchaser of property subject to sales or use taxes in this state, shall be deemed to be engaged in business in this state if:

(a) Such retailer made total retail sales of property in this state that exceeded one hundred thousand dollars in the previous or current calendar year; or

(b) Such retailer made retail sales in this state in two hundred or more separate transactions in the previous or current calendar year.

(3) A multivendor marketplace platform that acts as an intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and the purchaser of property subject to sales or use taxes in this state shall be deemed to be engaged in business in this state if:

(a) The multivendor marketplace platform made or facilitated total retail sales of property in this state that exceeded one hundred thousand dollars in the previous or current calendar year; or

(b) The multivendor marketplace platform made or facilitated retail sales in this state in two hundred or more separate transactions in the previous or current calendar year.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-2702.06;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB284, § 1.